utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.aff
SFX h ist  eitīs   [k]rist  is:2vta0
SFX h ist  eitās   [k]rist  is:3xta0
SFX h ist  eitamīs [k]rist  is:1dta0
SFX h ist  eitatīs [k]rist  is:2dta0
SFX h ist  eititīs [k]rist  is:2dtap
SFX h ist  eitūtīs [k]rist  is:0xtaa
