utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
audzēt/HLNhln37-
audzynuot/HLNhln37-
auklēt/HLNhln37-
baruot/HLNhln37-
bāduot/HLNhln37-
byrdynuot/HLNhln37-
byzuot/HLNhln37-
bīdynuot/HLNhln37-
bludavuot/HLNhln37-
bolsuot/HLNhln37-
braukalēt/HLNhln37-
braukuot/HLNhln37-
breidynuot/HLNhln37-
breinuot/hln37-
brīdynuot/HLNhln37-
broduot/HLNhln37-
bubynuot/HLNhln37-
bučuot/HLNhln37-
būrtuot/HLNhln37-
cyluot/HLNhln37-
cīmuot/hln37-
cīnuot/HLNhln37-
čatuot/HLNhln37-
čyvynuot/HLNhln37-
čubynuot/HLNhln37-
čupinēt/HLNhln37-
čuruot/HLNhln37-
dadzynuot/HLNhln37-
dancynuot/HLNhln37-
darbynuot/HLNhln37-
daudzynuot/HLNhln37-
deldēt/HLNhln37-
dybynuot/HLNhln37-
dīvynuot/HLNhln37-
doncuot/HLNhln37-
drukuot/HLNhln37-
drūsynuot/HLNhln37-
dunguot/HLNhln37-
duovynuot/HLNhln37-
dzeivynuot/HLNhln37-
dzeltēt/HLNhln37-
dzenēt/HLNhln37-
dzilinuot/HLNhln37-
dzyrdynuot/HLNhln37-
dzīdynuot/HLNhln37-
dzīduot/HLNhln37-
dzonuot/HLNhln37-
ecēt/HLNhln37-
eisynuot/HLNhln37-
eistynuot/HLNhln37-
gaisynuot/HLNhln37-
gaismuot/HLNhln37-
garšuot/HLNhln37-
gauduot/HLNhln37-
globuot/HLNhln37-
golvuot/HLNhln37-
grabynuot/HLNhln37-
grauduot/HLNhln37-
grākuot/HLNhln37-
gruobuot/HLNhln37-
guoduot/HLNhln37-
gūdynuot/HLNhln37-
gūļuot/HLNhln37-
īskuot/HLNhln37-
juodelēt/HLNhln37-
kaitavuot/HLNhln37-
kaltēt/HLNhln37-
karuot/HLNhln37-
kitynuot/HLNhln37-
kiukuot/HLNhln37-
kiupynuot/HLNhln37-
klabynuot/HLNhln37-
klaiguot/HLNhln37-
kleivuot/HLNhln37-
klenčuot/HLNhln37-
klusynuot/HLNhln37-
knuobuot/HLNhln37-
kolpuot/HLNhln37-
komuot/HLNhln37-
kopuot/HLNhln37-
krāsluot/HLNhln37-
krist/HMNhmn38-
kruosuot/HLNhln37-
kuopelēt/HLNhln37-
kuortuot/HLNhln37-
kuosēt/HLNhln37-
kurynuot/HLNhln37-
kūpuot/HLNhln37-
kvālynuot/HLNhln37-
labynuot/HLNhln37-
laidynuot/HLNhln37-
laikuot/HLNhln37-
laipuot/HLNhln37-
lakavuot/HLNhln37-
lauluot/HLNhln37-
leidzynuot/HLNhln37-
leiguot/HLNhln37-
likt/HLNhln37-
līcynuot/HLNhln37-
lītuot/HLNhln37-
lobuot/HLNhln37-
lomuot/HLNhln37-
luncynuot/HLNhln37-
lutynuot/HLNhln37-
ļustynuot/HLNhln37-
maituot/HLNhln37-
maluot/HLNhln37-
mauduot/HLNhln37-
mauruot/HLNhln37-
māruot/HLNhln37-
medeit/HKNhkn36-
meilynuot/HLNhln37-
meiļuot/HLNhln37-
meistaruot/HLNhln37-
meklēt/HLNhln37-
merkavuot/HLNhln37-
mērcēt/HLNhln37-
migt/HLNhln37-
myrguot/HLNhln37-
myurēt/HLNhln37-
mīreit/HKNhkn36-
moksuot/HLNhln37-
montuot/HLNhln37-
mozguot/HLNhln37-
mozynuot/HLNhln37-
mudynuot/HLNhln37-
mulsynuot/HLNhln37-
muot/HLNhln37-
mūdynuot/HLNhln37-
nycynuot/HLNhln37-
nosuot/HLNhln37-
parkuot/HLNhln37-
peipuot/HLNhln37-
pesteit/HKNhkn36-
pylnveiduot/HLNhln37-
pyutynuot/HLNhln37-
pīklusynuot/HLNh37-
placynuot/HLNhln37-
plepinēt/HLNhln37-
plyukuot/HLNhln37-
pludynuot/HLNhln37-
pluovuot/HLNhln37-
pļuopuot/HLNhln37-
pratynuot/HLNhln37-
prīcynuot/HLNhln37-
pulcynuot/HLNhln37-
puškuot/HLNhln37-
putynuot/HLNhln37-
pūguot/HLNhln37-
radynuot/HLNhln37-
raksturuot/HLNhln37-
ratavuot/HLNhln37-
ratynuot/HLNhln37-
rauduot/HLNhln37-
raudzēt/HLNhln37-
ražuot/HLNhln37-
reikuot/HLNhln37-
revēt/HLNhln37-
riekinuot/HLNhln37-
rymdynuot/HLNhln37-
rypynuot/HLNhln37-
rysynuot/HLNhln37-
ryukuot/HLNhln37-
ryusēt/HLNhln37-
ruļavuot/HLNhln37-
runuot/HLNhln37-
rūbežuot/HLNhln37-
rūsynuot/HLNhln37-
rūtuot/HLNhln37-
sacynuot/HLNhln37-
saimnīkuot/HLNhln37-
sakņuot/HLNhln37-
saldēt/HLNhln37-
sādynuot/HLNhln37-
sejuot/HLNhln37-
sekuot/HLNhln37-
sist/HMNhnm38-
skaidruot/HLNhln37-
skoluot/HLNhln37-
skraidelēt/HLNhln37-
skubynuot/HLNhln37-
skuobēt/HLNhln37-
slavēt/HLNhln37-
sleicynuot/HLNhln37-
sliepuot/HLNhln37-
sludynuot/HLNhln37-
smydzynuot/HLNhln37-
snigt/HLNhln37-
sorguot/HLNhln37-
spaiduot/HLNhln37-
spieļuot/HLNhln37-
spītuot/HLNhln37-
spūdrynuot/HLNhln37-
staiguot/HLNhln37-
steipuot/HLNhln37-
styprynuot/HLNhln37-
storuot/HLNhln37-
streipuot/HLNhln37-
stresuot/HLNhln37-
struoduot/HLNhln37-
stuodynuot/HLNhln37-
sukuot/HLNhln37-
sumynuot/HLNhln37-
suoleit/HKNhkn36-
sutynuot/HLNhln37-
svaidzynuot/HLNhln37-
sveicynuot/HLNhln37-
sviļpuot/HLNhln37-
svylynuot/HLNhln37-
šaravuot/HLNhln37-
šausmynuot/HLNhln37-
škatynuot/HLNhln37-
škurynuot/HLNhln37-
šķeterēt/HLNhln37-
šliucynuot/HLNhln37-
štukuot/HLNhln37-
švacynuot/HLNhln37-
taisnuot/HLNhln37-
tāluot/HLNhln37-
tārpynuot/HLNhln37-
teireit/HKNhkn36-
tierguot/HLNhln37-
tikt/HLNhln37-
tyvynuot/HLNhln37-
tīsuot/HLNhln37-
tolkavuot/HLNhln37-
traucēt/HLNhln37-
trokuot/HLNhln37-
tulkuot/HLNhln37-
turpynuot/HLNhln37-
ūšņuot/HLNhln37-
vadynuot/HLNhln37-
vaicuot/HLNhln37-
vainuot/HLNhln37-
vasaluot/HLNhln37-
vādynuot/HLNhln37-
vāruot/HLNhln37-
veicynuot/HLNhln37-
veiduot/HLNhln37-
veilēt/HLNhln37-
velēt/HLNhln37-
viļkt/HLNhln37-
vycynuot/HLNhln37-
vylynuot/HLNhln37-
vyltuot/HLNhln37-
vyngrynuot/HLNhln37-
vyrynuot/HLNhln37-
vyspuorynuot/HLNhln37-
vyzynuot/HLNhln37-
vīnuot/HLNhln37-
vītuot/HLNhln37-
voduot/HLNhln37-
volkuot/HLNhln37-
vuoļuot/HLNhln37-
vuorguot/HLNhln37-
vuovuļuot/HLNhln37-
zeimēt/HLNhln37-
zeimuot/HLNhln37-
zeļteit/HKNhkn36-
zibsneit/HKNhkn36-
zynuot/HLNhln37-
zīdynuot/HLNhln37-
zīduot/HLNhln37-
zudynuot/HLNhln37-
žabravuot/HLNhln37-
žāluot/HLNhln37-
